Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SUMMIT ACADEMY OIC; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Summit Academy OIC to expand student enrollment, employment placement, and program access in the Twin Cities and in Minnesota; to expand GED preparation and administration and STEM programming; and to start and enroll students in a dental assistant program and work with employers to place students upon successful completion of the program. new text end